Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.430

Administrative procedure act to govern administration.

The administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, wherever applicable governs the rights, remedies, and procedures respecting the administration of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 199 s 28; 1993 c 471 s 22.]